Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-3204] State commissioners. (a)
The governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, shall appoint the
members of the commission for this State of the Western Interstate Commission
for Higher Education that is created under the provisions of Article III of the
Western Regional Education Compact. The positions of commissioners shall be
placed within the University of Hawaii for administrative purposes.

(b) The qualifications and terms of office of
the members of the commission for this State shall conform with Article IV of
the compact.

(c) The commissioners shall serve without
compensation, but they shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary
expenses by the Western Interstate Commission for Higher Education.

(d) The commissioners for this State, with the
help of an advisory committee selected by them, shall certify those students
from the State of Hawaii who may receive special assistance in their
professional education from the State, under contracts provided for in the
Western Regional Education Compact. [L 2006, c 75, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next